New Jersey, session 221, A3349.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no approving authority shall schedule or convene a hearing to consider an application, pending as of, or following, the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), for the speculative development of a warehouse on active farmland, nor shall any approving authority take a vote on the merits of that application or a vote on a resolution memorializing an approval, until the date the State Agriculture Development Committee, established pursuant to section 4 of the Right to Farm Act, P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-4), catalogs 500,000 acres of preserved farmland under farmland preservation programs.  An application for the speculative development of a warehouse on active farmland may be considered by an approving authority if the applicant commits to the approving authority and to the State Agriculture Development Committee to preserve an area of farmland in the State equal in size to the number of acres proposed for development in the application.  The State Agriculture Development Committee shall report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature when the State Agriculture Development Committee catalogs 500,000 acres of preserved farmland under farmland preservation programs. b.    As used in this section: Active farmland means farmland used for agricultural purposes as of the date of enactment of P.L. , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). Speculative development means the construction of a warehouse without a contractual commitment from a warehouse tenant or buyer. Warehouse means a building that stores cargo, goods, or products of any type on a short-term or long-term basis for later distribution to wholesale or retail customers, and includes, but is not limited to, a distribution center, flex-warehouse, or any other type of warehouse. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the date the State Agriculture Development Committee submits the report required pursuant to subsection a of section 1 of this act confirming the cataloging of 500,000 acres of preserved farmland under farmland preservation programs.